South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S448.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-1-560.  (A) The Department of Motor Vehicles is authorized to develop a secure and uniform system, to be known as the "Electronic Driver's License System," for authorizing a person to present or submit evidence of a valid driver's license in an optional electronic format in lieu of a physical driver's license. An acceptable electronic format includes display of electronic images on a cellular telephone or any other type of portable electronic device. The department may contract with one or more entities to develop the electronic driver's license system. The department or entity may develop a mobile software application capable of being utilized through a person's electronic device to access an electronic image of his driver's license. (B) In lieu of a physical driver's license, a person who participates in the system may present or submit evidence of possession of a valid driver's license in an electronic format, which must be accepted as evidence for identification and other purposes, including upon the request of a law enforcement officer or a seller of alcoholic beverages. The electronic driver's license system shall allow law enforcement officers to verify the authenticity of the driver's license. If a person displays his driver's license in an electronic format pursuant to this subsection, the person is not consenting for a law enforcement officer to access any other content of the electronic device. (C) The department shall disable, suspend, or terminate a person's participation in the electronic driver's license system if: (1) the physical driver's license issued to the participant has been cancelled, revoked, or suspended; or (2) the participant reports that his electronic device has been lost or stolen. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----